Nebraska, session 109, LB920.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB920 LB920
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 77-3003.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
77-3003.01 (1)(a) The Tax Commissioner or his or her agents or
employees, at the direction of the Tax Commissioner, or any peace officer
of this state may seize, without a warrant, any mechanical amusement
device if there is cause to believe such mechanical amusement device is
not in compliance with the Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act or any
rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act or if the
department determines the response to a request for information is
materially deficient without good cause. In addition to seizure, any
person placing in service or operating a cash device constituting an
illegal game of chance or an unlicensed cash device of any kind within
this state shall be subject to a penalty of up to one thousand dollars
for each day of such operation. The Tax Commissioner has the authority to
suspend or revoke the license of any operator, manufacturer, or
distributor of a cash device that is in violation of this section.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, a mechanical amusement device
is subject to seizure and penalties as if it were a game of chance if:
(i) The mechanical amusement device is a cash device; and
(ii) The mechanical amusement device does not bear an unexpired
decal as required under the Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act.
(c) This section does not apply to any device (i) used in any bingo,
lottery by the sale of pickle cards, or other lottery, raffle, or gift
enterprise conducted in accordance with the Nebraska Bingo Act, Nebraska
County and City Lottery Act, Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act, Nebraska
Pickle Card Lottery Act, Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act, State
Lottery Act, or section 9-701, (ii) used for a prize contest as defined
in section 28-1101, (iii) specifically authorized by the laws of this
state, or (iv) regulated under the Nebraska Racetrack Gaming Act.
(2) To receive a determination from the department that a cash
device is in compliance with the Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act and
-2-

LB920 LB920
2026 2026
any rules and regulations adopted and promulgated under the act, a
manufacturer or distributor of the device shall:
(a) Submit an application to the Tax Commissioner containing
information regarding the device's location, software, Internet
connectivity, and configuration as may be required by the Tax
Commissioner;
(b) Submit an application fee of five hundred dollars;
(c) Provide a specimen of the proposed cash device;
(d) Provide all supporting evidence, including a report by an
independent testing laboratory certified by the Tax Commissioner, to the
Tax Commissioner indicating that, under all configurations, settings, and
modes of operation, operation of the cash device constitutes a game of
skill and not a game of chance and the use, operation, sale, or
manufacture of the cash device would not constitute a violation of
section 28-1107; and
(e) Provide an affidavit from the manufacturer or distributor
affirming that no functional changes in hardware or software will be made
to the approved cash device without further approval from the Tax
Commissioner.
(3) The Tax Commissioner shall issue a response in writing to the
applicant within forty-five days after the applicant has completed and
submitted all application requirements. The Tax Commissioner's response
shall state the reason for any denial or the reasons a determination
cannot be made.
(4)(a) A cash device shall not be considered a game of skill if one
or more of the following apply:
(i) The ability of any player to succeed at the game played on the
cash device is impacted by the number or ratio of prior wins to prior
losses of players playing such cash device;
(ii) The ability of the player to succeed at the game played on the
cash device is impacted by the ability of any person to set a specified
-3-

LB920 LB920
2026 2026
win-loss ratio for the cash device or by the cash device having a
predetermined win-loss percentage;
(iii) The outcome of the game played on the cash device can be
controlled by a source other than any player playing the cash device;
(iv) The success of any player is or may be determined by a chance
event which cannot be altered by player action;
(v) There is no possibility for the player to win every game played
on the cash device or there are unwinnable games or game modes on the
cash device;
(vi) The ability of any player to succeed at the game played on the
cash device requires the exercise of skill that no reasonable player
could exercise; or
(vii) The primary determination of the prize amount is determined by
the presentation or generation of a particular puzzle or group of symbols
dealt to the player and the player does not have control over the puzzle
or group of symbols presented.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, reasonable player means a
player with an average level of intelligence, physical and mental skills,
reaction time, and dexterity.
(5) The department or any court considering whether a gambling
device is a game of skill may consider:
(a) The results of an analysis by the independent testing laboratory
certified by the Tax Commissioner to evaluate the reaction time required
for a player of a particular game on such cash device to perform the
tasks required by the game to win; or
(b) The results of an analysis by the independent testing laboratory
certified by the Tax Commissioner to evaluate factors set forth by the
Tax Commissioner, other than reaction time, required for the player of a
particular game on such cash device to perform the tasks required by the
game to win.
(6) Factors which are not sufficient indications of a skill-based
-4-

LB920 LB920
2026 2026
game include, but are not limited to:
(a) Whether a comprehensive list of prizes or outcomes is offered to
the player or whether all outcomes are drawn from a finite pool of
predetermined outcomes or starting positions;
(b) Whether a player can increase his or her chance of winning based
on knowledge of probabilities in general or the probabilities of any
particular prize or outcome in a game or on a cash device;
(c) Whether a player can simply choose not to play before committing
money or credits; or
(d) A game task consisting solely of moving a symbol up or down,
replacing one symbol with another, or any similar action, with or without
a timer.
(7) Upon approval of an application based on a determination that
the mechanical amusement device is a game of skill and not a game of
chance, the Tax Commissioner shall issue a mechanical amusement device
decal for the device as configured and as provided in subsection (8) of
this section. No mechanical amusement device decal shall be issued for
any cash device unless the department has determined that (a) such cash
device is a game of skill and not a game of chance and that the
manufacture, sale, transport, placement, possession, or operation of such
cash device does not constitute a violation of section 28-1107 and (b)
the appearance of such cash device does not violate subsection (9) of
this section. If the Tax Commissioner does not approve the application
for the cash device, the application shall be denied and the operator
shall have the opportunity for an administrative hearing before the Tax
Commissioner at which evidence may be presented on the issue of whether
the cash device is specifically authorized by law and is not a gambling
device as defined in section 28-1101. After such hearing, the Tax
Commissioner shall enter a final decision approving or denying the
application. The Tax Commissioner's final decision may be appealed, and
the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
-5-

LB920 LB920
2026 2026
(8)(a) Upon approval of a specimen of a cash device as a game of
skill under this section, the department may issue a mechanical amusement
device decal for each such cash device:
(i) If certified by the manufacturer to be functionally identical in
both hardware and software configurations to the specimen provided to the
department; and
(ii) If the application fee described in subdivision (2)(b) of this
section and the annual decal fee described in subdivision (c) of this
subsection have been paid.
(b)(i) In order for a distributor or operator of a cash device to
place a cash device into operation at a retail establishment, other than
a retail establishment owned or operated by a fraternal benefit society
organized and licensed under sections 44-1072 to 44-10,109 or a
recognized veterans organization as defined in section 80-401.01, such
retail establishment shall generate at least sixty percent of the gross
operating revenue of such retail establishment from sources other than
the total gross operating revenue of any cash devices located within the
retail establishment.
(ii) The number of cash devices permitted at any retail
establishment shall not exceed the lesser of either:
(A) Except for a fraternal benefit society organized and licensed
under sections 44-1072 to 44-10,109 or a recognized veterans organization
as defined in section 80-401.01, the number of cash devices it takes to
generate forty percent of the gross operating revenue of the retail
establishment; or
(B) Four cash devices, except that an establishment with over four
thousand square feet may have one cash device for each one thousand
square feet, up to a maximum of fifteen cash devices.
(c) The distributor or operator of a cash device shall pay an annual
decal fee of two hundred fifty dollars to the department for each cash
device in operation in Nebraska. The decal issued under this section
-6-

LB920 LB920
2026 2026
shall be distinct from other decals issued by the department for
mechanical amusement devices that are not required to be evaluated under
this section. Regardless of the issuance of a decal by the department, no
cash device shall be considered in compliance if it does not bear an
unexpired decal in a conspicuous place.
(9)(a) An operator, distributor, or manufacturer of a cash device
shall not market, advertise, promote, or make available any cash device
in this state if the device or its container, packaging, or advertising
materials:
(i) Depict a cartoon-like or fictional character primarily used to
appeal to minors; or
(ii) Imitate or mimic the trademark, trade dress, branding, or
packaging of products primarily marketed to minors.
(b)(i) No person shall place or permit exterior advertising for a
cash device on or about any premises where such device is located except
as provided in this section.
(ii) Each premises where a cash device is located may display not
more than three exterior signs advertising the availability of a cash
device available for play at such location. Any such sign shall:
(A) Not exceed eleven inches in height and ten inches in width; and
(B) Be permanently affixed to the exterior of the building that
contains a cash device.
(iii) No exterior banner, flag, window wraps, digital display,
vehicle wrap, or other exterior advertising media shall be used to
advertise a cash device other than the signs permitted pursuant to
subdivision (9)(b)(ii) of this section.
(10) (9) The application process described in this section shall not
be construed to limit further investigation by the department or the
issuance of further regulations to promote compliance after the
application process is completed. At any point after a determination of
skill by the department, the department may request from the
-7-

LB920 LB920
2026 2026
manufacturer, distributor, or operator information about any cash device
in operation in this state, including, but not limited to, information
regarding currently operable source code, changes to software or
hardware, and communications from or to the device over the Internet. A
manufacturer, distributor, or operator that receives a request shall
respond with all responsive information in its possession or control
within fifteen business days.
(11) (10) If a manufacturer or distributor receives a determination
from the department that a cash device is not in compliance with the
Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act, such manufacturer or distributor
shall have ten thirty days after the issuance of that determination to
(a) provide proof of correction and compliance or (b) remove any such
cash device from operation in Nebraska.
(12) (11) Application fees collected under subsection (2) of this
section and annual decal fees collected under subsection (8) of this
section shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the
Department of Revenue Enforcement Fund.
Sec. 2. Section 77-3003.02, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-3003.02 (1) No cash device shall be operated using a credit card,
charge card, or debit card.
(2) No person under twenty-one years of age shall play or
participate in any way in the operation of a cash device. No distributor,
operator, or employee or agent of any distributor or operator shall
knowingly permit any individual under twenty-one years of age to play or
participate in any way in the operation of a cash device. The
distributor, operator, or employee or agent shall verify the age of any
individual requesting to play a cash device and shall comply with
subsections (3) and (4) of this section.
(3) Beginning August 1, 2026, an operator of a cash device shall not
make such device available for play at a retail establishment unless an
-8-

LB920 LB920
2026 2026
attendant is physically present on the premises of such retail
establishment and capable of actively supervising play of such cash
device. An attendant shall be considered to be actively supervising play
of such cash device if the attendant:
(a) Visually confirms the age of the player in conjunction with the
electronic age-verification required pursuant to subsection (4) of this
section; and
(b) Continuously monitors the area in which a cash device is located
and intervenes to prevent play of a cash device by any person under
twenty-one years of age.
(4)(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c) of this subsection, on
and after January 1, 2028, an operator shall not make a cash device
available for play in a retail establishment unless such device is
equipped with an age-verification mechanism capable of scanning and
electronically authenticating a government-issued identification card.
(b) The age-verification mechanism shall meet technical standards
approved by the department. Such standards shall include, but need not be
limited to:
(i) Age-verification methods that prevent play of such cash device
until the age of the player has been electronically verified as twenty-
one years of age or older; and
(ii) Requirement of an age-verification identification scan prior to
each gameplay session on the cash device and prior to each voucher print
or redemption transaction.
(c) This subsection shall not apply to a cash device located in a
retail establishment that does not allow individuals under twenty-one
years of age to enter.
(5) (2) No distributor or operator shall charge a fee or require a
gratuity in return for the payment of any prize money won by a player of
a cash device.
(6) (3) The Tax Commissioner has the authority to suspend or revoke
-9-

LB920 LB920
2026 2026
the license of any distributor or operator of a cash device for a
violation of this section.
(7) (4) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations for the implementation and enforcement of this section as
long as such rules and regulations do not restrict how a cash device
manufacturer, distributor, or operator markets or advertises the
existence of a cash device, unless the advertiser or marketer of a cash
device is willfully conflating the cash device play with casino-style
gambling or slot machine wagering.
Sec. 3. Section 77-3006, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-3006 (1) The administration of the Mechanical Amusement Device
Tax Act is hereby vested in the Tax Commissioner subject to other
provisions of law relating to the Tax Commissioner. The Tax Commissioner
may prescribe, adopt and promulgate, and enforce rules and regulations
relating to the administration and enforcement of the act and may
delegate authority to his or her representatives to conduct hearings or
perform any other duties imposed under the act. The Tax Commissioner
shall may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry
out section 77-3003.01. Such rules and regulations shall include
standards for determining when advertising or packaging is used to appeal
to minors or primarily marketed to minors.
(2) The department has the authority to review all documents between
a distributor, manufacturer, and operator regarding a cash device. Such
documents shall include, but not be limited to, any a contract,
agreement, lease, revenue-sharing agreement, profit-sharing document,
annual report, tax filing, or bill of sale.
(3) The department has the authority to approve all cash device
locations across the state. No cash device shall be moved from such cash
device's approved location without the prior approval of the department.
The department may examine and audit any retail establishment operating a
-10-

LB920 LB920
2026 2026
cash device without prior notice to verify compliance with the act.
(4) The department shall establish retail establishment location
standards required for the placement of any cash device in this state.
(5) The following factors shall be considered for the issuance of a
license to operate a cash device at a particular retail establishment
location:
(a) Whether there are physical walls separating a retail
establishment operating a cash device from other businesses located in
the same building;
(b) Whether there are dedicated entrances and exits to the retail
establishment;
(c) Whether a separate sales tax permit has been obtained by the
retail establishment;
(d) Whether the retail establishment has separate points of sale;
(e) Whether the retail establishment has separate points of ticket
redemption;
(f) Whether there is diversity of merchandise for sale in the retail
establishment;
(g) Whether the retail establishment issues a receipt for sales;
(h) The number of dedicated employees on duty at the same time at
the retail establishment;
(i) The level of business activity being conducted in the retail
establishment;
(j) Whether the physical space for the retail establishment within
the building is contiguous to other businesses; and
(k) Whether there are distinct owners or officers of the retail
establishment within the shared building.
Sec. 4. Section 77-3009, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-3009 (1) Any distributor or operator who places a cash device
into operation in the State of Nebraska without the necessary decal being
-11-

LB920 LB920
2026 2026
placed conspicuously upon it or without having obtained the necessary
license shall be subject to an administrative penalty of up to one
thousand dollars per day for each unlicensed cash device.
(2) Any cash device which (a) does not have the necessary decal
conspicuously displayed upon it or (b) does not comply with the age-
verification requirements of subsection (4) of section 77-3003.02 shall
be subject to being sealed by the Tax Commissioner or his or her
delegate. If such seal is broken prior to payment of the occupation tax
upon such cash device, the cash device shall be subject to forfeiture and
sale by the Tax Commissioner.
(3) Any person violating the Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act
shall be guilty of a Class II misdemeanor. Each day on which any person
engages in or conducts the business of operating or distributing the
mechanical amusement devices subject to the Mechanical Amusement Device
Tax Act, without having paid the tax or obtained the required license as
provided, shall constitute a separate offense.
(4) The department has the authority to levy an administrative
penalty of up to one thousand dollars per day for any other violation of
the act.
Sec. 5. Section 77-3012, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
77-3012 (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this
section, a tax is hereby imposed and levied, in the amount and in
accordance with this section, upon the net operating revenue of all cash
devices operating within the State of Nebraska for profit or gain either
directly or indirectly received. The tax shall be paid in the amount and
manner specified in this section.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section,
beginning on and after July 1, 2025, any distributor of a cash device,
and any operator of a cash device if the operator is not subject to a
revenue-sharing or other agreement with a distributor who is paying the
-12-

LB920 LB920
2026 2026
tax, shall pay a tax for each cash device in operation each calendar
quarter during the taxable year. The tax shall be collected by the
department and due and payable on January 1, April 1, July 1, and October
1 of each year on each cash device in operation during the preceding
calendar quarter. For each cash device put into operation on a date
subsequent to a quarterly due date that has not been included in
computing the tax imposed and levied by the Mechanical Amusement Device
Tax Act, the tax shall be due and payable on the immediately succeeding
quarterly due date.
(3) The amount of the tax imposed and levied under this section
shall be fifteen five percent of the net operating revenue for each cash
device. The quarterly tax shall be submitted on a form prescribed by the
Tax Commissioner documenting the total gross and net operating revenue
for that quarter.
(4) The Tax Commissioner shall remit the taxes collected pursuant to
this section to the State Treasurer for credit as follows:
(a) Two and one-half Twenty percent to the Charitable Gaming
Operations Fund for enforcement of the act and maintenance of the central
server;
(b) Two and one-half percent to the Compulsive Gamblers Assistance
Fund;
(c) Nine-tenths of a Two and one-half percent to the General Fund;
(d) Three and four-tenths Ten percent to the Nebraska Tourism
Commission Promotional Cash Fund;
(e) Thirteen and thirty-five hundredths Forty percent to the
Property Tax Credit Cash Fund; and
(f) Sixty-eight and ninety-five hundredths percent to the Nebraska
Child Care Aid Fund; and
(g) (f) The remaining eight and four-tenths twenty-five percent to
the county treasurer of the county in which the cash device is located to
be distributed as follows: (i) If the cash device is located completely
-13-

LB920 LB920
2026 2026
within an unincorporated area of a county, the remaining eight and four-
tenths twenty-five percent shall be distributed to the county in which
the cash device is located, or (ii) if the cash device is located within
the limits of a city or village in such county, one-half of the remaining
eight and four-tenths twenty-five percent shall be distributed to such
county and one-half of the remaining eight and four-tenths twenty-five
percent shall be distributed to the city or village in which such cash
device is located.
(5) This section does not apply to cash devices operated by a
fraternal benefit society organized and licensed under sections 44-1072
to 44-10,109 or a recognized veterans organization as defined in section
80-401.01.
Sec. 6. The Nebraska Child Care Aid Fund is created. The fund shall
consist of funds received pursuant to section 77-3012, any money
transferred by the Legislature, and any gifts, grants, or bequests from
any source, including federal, state, public, and private sources. The
fund shall be used for state child care subsidies within the State of
Nebraska. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 7. Original sections 77-3003.01, 77-3003.02, 77-3006, 77-3009,
and 77-3012, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-14-